Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Article 4 Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact

Editor’s notes.

Section 14 of the compact provides that the “compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state.” As of May 8, 2017, the tenth member state enacted the compact into law. The former article consisted of Code Sections

38-3-70

through 38-3-73, relating to emergency management, and was based on Ga. L. 1973, p. 459, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1186, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38; Code 1981, § 38-3-73, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 497, § 1, and was repealed on March 1, 2002, pursuant to former Code Section 38-3-73.

38-3-70.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Recognition of Emergency Medical Services Personnel Licensure Interstate Compact (REPLICA).”

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 364, § 1/SB 109; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 38/SB 365.